Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.090

Violations—Penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation of any provision of this chapter shall constitute a distinct and separate offense. Offenses shall be reported to the appropriate law enforcement agency or to the director.

[ 1986 c 266 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 195 s 16; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 82 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 195: See note following RCW 27.53.020.